Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1420
Deposit of funds; Education Savings Plan Program Fund; Education Savings Plan Administrative Fund; Education Savings Plan Expense Fund; created; use; investment; State Treasurer; report.

(1) The State Treasurer shall deposit money received by the Nebraska educational savings plan trust into three funds: The Education Savings Plan Program Fund, the Education Savings Plan Expense Fund, and the Education Savings Plan Administrative Fund. The State Treasurer shall deposit money received by the trust into the appropriate fund. The State Treasurer and Accounting Administrator of the Department of Administrative Services shall determine the state fund types necessary to comply with section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code and state policy. The money in the funds shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to policies established by the Nebraska Investment Council. The program fund, the expense fund, and the administrative fund shall be separately administered. The Nebraska educational savings plan trust shall be operated with no General Fund appropriations.

(2) The Education Savings Plan Program Fund is created. All money paid in connection with participation agreements and all investment income earned on such money shall be deposited as received into separate accounts within the program fund. Contributions to the trust may only be made in the form of cash. All funds generated in connection with participation agreements shall be deposited into the appropriate accounts within the program fund. A participant or beneficiary shall not provide investment direction regarding program contributions or earnings held by the trust. Until January 1, 2029, money accrued in the program fund may be used for the benefit of a beneficiary for payments to any eligible postsecondary educational institution or recognized postsecondary credential program, but shall not be used to pay expenses associated with attending kindergarten through grade twelve. Beginning January 1, 2029, money accrued in the program fund may be used for the benefit of a beneficiary for payments to any elementary or secondary school, eligible postsecondary educational institution, or recognized postsecondary credential program. Any money in the program fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(3) The Education Savings Plan Administrative Fund is created. Money from the trust transferred from the expense fund to the administrative fund in an amount authorized by an appropriation from the Legislature shall be utilized to pay for the costs of administering, operating, and maintaining the trust, to the extent permitted by section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code. The administrative fund shall not be credited with any money other than money transferred from the expense fund in an amount authorized by an appropriation by the Legislature or any interest income earned on the balances held in the administrative fund. Any money in the administrative fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(4)(a) The Education Savings Plan Expense Fund is created. The expense fund shall be funded with fees assessed to the program fund. The State Treasurer shall use the expense fund:

(i) To pay costs associated with the Nebraska educational savings plan trust;

(ii) For the purposes described in the Meadowlark Act; and

(iii) To transfer from the expense fund to the State Investment Officer's Cash Fund an amount equal to the pro rata share of the budget appropriated to the Nebraska Investment Council as permitted in section 72-1249.02, to cover reasonable expenses incurred for investment management of the Nebraska educational savings plan trust. Annually and prior to such transfer to the State Investment Officer's Cash Fund, the State Treasurer shall report to the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services and to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst the amounts transferred during the previous fiscal year. The report submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically.

(b) Any money in the expense fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2000, LB 1003, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 574, § 29;

Laws 2010, LB197, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 240;

Laws 2012, LB1104, § 7;

Laws 2019, LB52, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB610, § 11;

Laws 2020, LB1042, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 85-1807;

Laws 2025, LB647, § 45;

Laws 2026, LB748, § 4.
July 18, 2026
Meadowlark Act, see section 85-2801.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.